dev/conjunction/conjunction.ne.dix
  <!-- एबं; एबं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एबं__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- र; र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="र__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भन्नें; भन्नें; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भन्नें__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एवं; एवं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एवं__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यसैविच; यसैविच; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यसैविच__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- किनभने; किनभने; 1 -->
    <pardef n="किनभने__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- की; की; 1 -->
    <pardef n="की__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- की; की; 1 -->
    <pardef n="की__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- के; के; 1 -->
    <pardef n="के__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="एबं"><i>एबं</i><par n="एबं__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="र"><i>र</i><par n="र__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="भन्नें"><i>भन्नें</i><par n="भन्नें__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="एवं"><i>एवं</i><par n="एवं__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="यसैविच"><i>यसैविच</i><par n="यसैविच__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="किनभने"><i>किनभने</i><par n="किनभने__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="की"><i>की</i><par n="की__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="की"><i>की</i><par n="की__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="के"><i>के</i><par n="के__cnjcoo"/></e>
